Tennessee, session 114, SB2080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-32-124, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding another law, beginning July 1, 2026, the first one hundred
fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) of tax revenue collected pursuant to this section must
be utilized to draw down federal funds to reimburse a physician, advanced practice
registered nurse, or physician assistant who is entitled to receive TennCare
reimbursement for a CPT code for evaluation and management, obstetrics and
gynecology, or anesthesia pursuant to § 71-5-175.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
71-5-175.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as
defined in § 63-7-126;
(2) "CPT code" means the unique numerical designations established by
the American Medical Association for various medical, surgical, and diagnostic
services used in billing healthcare services;
(3) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to
title 63, chapter 6, or osteopathic medicine pursuant to title 63, chapter 9; and
SB2080
011467
- 1 -

(4) "Physician assistant" means a person licensed pursuant to title 63,
chapter 19.
(b) Notwithstanding another law, beginning July 1, 2026, the first one hundred
fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) of tax revenue collected under the health
maintenance organization tax levied pursuant to § 56-32-124 must be utilized to draw
down federal funds to reimburse a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
physician assistant who is entitled to receive TennCare reimbursement for a CPT code
for evaluation and management, obstetrics and gynecology, or anesthesia.
(c) Reimbursement under subsection (b) must be allocated up to one hundred
ten percent (110%) of the current medicare reimbursement rate for the same CPT code.
(d) The bureau of TennCare and the department of commerce and insurance
may promulgate rules to effectuate this section. The rules must be promulgated in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter
5.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it, and applies to TennCare reimbursements for services provided
on or after that date.
- 2 - 011467